Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.110

Candidates' political committees—Limitations. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A candidate may not knowingly establish, use, direct, or control more than one political committee for the purpose of supporting that candidate during a particular election campaign. This does not prohibit: (1) In addition to a candidate's having his or her own political committee, the candidate's participation in a political committee established to support a slate of candidates that includes the candidate; or (2) joint fund-raising efforts by candidates when a separate political committee is established for that purpose and all contributions are disbursed to and accounted for on a pro rata basis by the benefiting candidates.

[ 2024 c 164 s 453; 2010 c 204 s 607. Formerly RCW 42.17A.440.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.